Illinois, session 104th, HB1634.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. First responder qualified wellness expense 8credit.9    (a) For taxable years that begin on or after January 1, 102026 and begin before January 1, 2031, each individual who (i) 11serves as a first responder for at least 10 months during the 12taxable year and (ii) incurs unreimbursed qualified wellness 13expenses during the taxable year may apply to the Department 14for a credit against the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and 15(b) of Section 201. The amount of the credit is equal to 50% of 16the unreimbursed qualified wellness expenses incurred by the 17taxpayer during the taxable year, up to a maximum of $250 per 18eligible taxpayer in each taxable year. The aggregate amount 19of all tax credits awarded by the Department under this 20Section in any calendar year may not exceed $2,500,000. 21Credits shall be awarded on a first-come, first-served basis. 22    (b) A credit under this Section may not reduce a 23taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of the   HB1634- 2 -LRB104 03589 HLH 19705 b1credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess may 2be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 5 3taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax credit 4shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 5liability. If there are credits for more than one year that are 6available to offset a liability, the earlier credit shall be 7applied first. 8    (c) Taxpayers claiming this credit must provide proof of 9employment as a first responder and provide documentation, 10including receipts or invoices, of qualified wellness expenses 11paid during the taxable year. 12    (d) The Department shall adopt rules to implement the 13credit under this Section. 14    (e) As used in this Section: 15    "First responder" means a person who is employed by the 16State or any unit of local government as a law enforcement 17officer, as a corrections officer, as a firefighter, or as 18emergency medical services personnel, as defined in the 19Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act. 20    "Qualified wellness expenses" means any of the following 21expenses when incurred for the benefit of the first responder: 22        (1) membership fees for fitness centers or health 23    clubs; 24        (2) fees for yoga, pilates, meditation, or similar 25    wellness classes; 26        (3) fees for martial arts or self-defense classes;  HB1634- 3 -LRB104 03589 HLH 19705 b1        (4) costs for group fitness programs or personal 2    training programs; and 3        (5) other physical or mental wellness programs 4    approved by the Department.  5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.